Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3508
Corporate filings required.

Within forty-five days after a community improvement district has been declared a public corporation by the city council or village board of trustees, the clerk of the community improvement district shall transmit to the Secretary of State a certified copy of the record relating thereto, including a copy of the articles of association, and the same shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State in the same manner as articles of incorporation are required to be filed under the general law concerning corporations. A copy of such record, including a copy of the articles of association and a plat of the community improvement district, shall also be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the community improvement district, or any part thereof, is situated.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 8.
April 17, 2026